Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 2 ADOPTION
19-5-207. Written consent and home study report for public adoptions - fingerprint-based criminal history record checks - investigation - rules.

When a child is placed for adoption by the county department of human or social services, a licensed child placement agency, or an individual, the department, agency, or individual shall file, with the petition to adopt, its written and verified consent
to such adoption in addition to any notices received or sent pursuant to the terms of the "Interstate Compact on Placement of Children" set forth in part 18 of article 60 of title 24.

In all petitions for adoption, whether by the court, the county department of human or social services, or child placement agencies, in addition to written consent, the court shall require a written home study report from the county department of human
or social services, the designated qualified individual, or the child placement agency approved by the state department of human services pursuant to section 19-5-207.5 (2) showing the following:

The physical and mental health, emotional stability, and moral integrity of the petitioner and the ability of the petitioner to promote the welfare of the child; but no physical examination shall be required of any person who in good faith relies upon
spiritual means or prayer in the free exercise of religion to prevent or cure disease unless there is reason to believe such person's physical condition is such that he or she would be unable to take care of such child;

Confirmation that the petitioner has participated in adoption counseling if the court deems appropriate. The counseling may address the permanence of the decision, the impact of the decision on the adopting parent and the adopting parent's family now
and in the future, and the issues that may arise in the event that the adoptee at some time in the future desires to contact the relinquishing parent.

The physical and mental condition of the child;

The child's family background, including the names of parents and other identifying data regarding the parents, if obtainable;

Reasons for the termination of the parent-child legal relationship;

The suitability of the adoption of this child by this petitioner and the child's own disposition toward the adoption in any case in which the child's age makes this feasible; and

The length of time the child has been in the care and custody of the petitioner.

(2.5) (a) (I) In all petitions for adoption, whether by the court, the county department of human or social services, or child placement agencies, in addition to the written home study report described in subsection (2) of this section, the court shall
require the county department of human or social services, the designated qualified individual, or the child placement agency to conduct the fingerprint-based criminal history record checks for any prospective adoptive
parent or any adult residing in the home.

For purposes of fulfilling the fingerprint-based criminal history record checks required in subsection (2.5)(a)(I) of this section, the state board of human services shall promulgate rules concerning petitions for adoption when a child is placed for adoption
by the county department of human or social services or a child placement agency to require each prospective adoptive parent attempting to adopt a child placed for adoption by the county department of human or social
services or a child placement agency to obtain fingerprint-based criminal history record checks through the Colorado bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation. The prospective adoptive parent
to whom this subsection (2.5)(a)(II) applies shall be responsible for the cost of the fingerprint-based criminal history record checks.

For purposes of fulfilling the criminal history records check required in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a), a prospective adoptive parent, other than a prospective adoptive parent specified in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), shall obtain
fingerprint-based criminal history record checks through the Colorado bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation. A prospective adoptive parent to whom this subparagraph (III) applies shall
be responsible for providing a complete set of fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation and for obtaining the fingerprint-based criminal history record checks. The prospective adoptive parent shall also
be responsible for the cost of the criminal history record checks.

A prospective adoptive parent described in subsection (2.5)(a)(III) of this section shall be responsible for presenting the results of his or her fingerprint-based criminal history record checks and the results of the fingerprint-based criminal history
records checks of any adult residing in the home to the court for review by the court. The county department of human or social services or the child placement agency, as may be appropriate, shall report to the
court any case in which fingerprint-based criminal history record checks reveal that the prospective adoptive parent who is attempting to adopt a child placed for adoption by a county department of human or social
services or child placement agency or any adult residing in the home was convicted at any time of a felony or misdemeanor in one of the following areas:

Child abuse or neglect;

Spousal abuse;

Any crime against a child, including but not limited to child pornography;

Any crime, the underlying factual basis of which has been found by the court on the record to include an act of domestic violence, as defined in section 18-6-800.3, C.R.S.;

Violation of a protection order, as described in section 18-6-803.5, C.R.S.;

Any crime involving violence, rape, sexual assault, or homicide; or

Any felony physical assault or battery conviction or felony drug-related conviction within, at a minimum, the past five years.

Notwithstanding the provisions of sub-subparagraph (B) of subparagraph (II) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (2.5), a licensed child placement agency or a county placement agency may conduct an investigation of a prospective adoptive parent's background
only if the fingerprint-based criminal history records check required pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.5) reveals that the prospective adoptive parent was convicted of a felony or misdemeanor at least
ten years prior to the application for adoption.

If a licensed child placement agency or a county placement agency conducts an investigation of the prospective adoptive parent, it shall have the opportunity to present its findings to the juvenile court responsible for reviewing the petition for adoption.
The licensed child placement agency or the county placement agency shall provide to the juvenile court responsible for reviewing the petition for adoption:

A certified copy of any criminal court documentation substantiating the disposition of the applicant's felony criminal case; or

Certified documentation that the court records concerning the felony case have been destroyed or are otherwise unavailable.

Pending the results of the investigation by the licensed child placement agency or the county placement agency and the juvenile court's ruling on the eligibility of the applicant for the placement of a child, the child shall not be placed in the prospective
adoptive parent's home if the fingerprint-based criminal history records check revealed that the prospective adoptive parent was convicted at any time of a felony or misdemeanor.

Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b), a person convicted of a felony offense specified in subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.5) may be allowed to adopt a child if:

The applicant has had no further arrests or convictions subsequent to the conviction;

The applicant has not been convicted of a pattern of misdemeanors, as defined by rule of the state board of human services; and

The court enters a finding consistent with section 19-5-210 (2)(d) that the adoption is in the best interests of the child.

A person convicted of a felony offense as described in this subparagraph (II) shall not be allowed to adopt a child if there is:

A felony conviction on the application for adoption that involves child abuse, as described in section 18-6-401, C.R.S.; a crime of violence, as defined in section 18-1.3-406, C.R.S.; or a felony offense involving unlawful sexual behavior, as defined
in section 16-22-102 (9), C.R.S.;

A felony conviction on the application for adoption that occurred less than five years prior to the application that involved physical assault or battery or a drug-related offense; or

A felony conviction on the application for adoption that occurred less than ten years prior to the application and involved domestic violence, as defined in section 18-6-800.3, C.R.S.

In addition to the fingerprint-based criminal history record checks, the county department of human or social services, the individual, or the child placement agency conducting the investigation shall contact the state department of human services and
the appropriate entity in each state in which the prospective adoptive parent or parents or any adult residing in the home has resided in the preceding five years to determine whether the prospective adoptive parent or
parents or any adult residing in the home has been found to be responsible in a confirmed report of child abuse or neglect and shall report such information to the court. Information obtained from any state records or reports
of child abuse or neglect must not be used for any purpose other than completing the investigation for approval of the prospective adoptive parent.

The state board of human services shall promulgate rules setting forth the procedures for the fingerprint-based criminal history record check and the report to the court described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.5).

In proposed relative adoptions, the court shall review the report prepared pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The court may order further assessment if the court deems it necessary.

Any party to the adoption proceeding may be entitled to see the report required by subsection (2) of this section; except that the names of parents and adoptive parents and any means of identifying either shall not be made available except upon order
of the court.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 99, p. 1018, § 1, effective May 29, 1999.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 99, p. 1018, § 1, effective May 29, 1999.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 99, p. 1018, § 1, effective May 29, 1999.)

If a court orders a county department of human or social services to counsel a birth parent concerning relinquishment of a child pursuant to the provisions of sections 19-5-103 and 19-5-104, the county department shall charge a fee to meet the full cost
of the counseling.

If the child is being placed in an adoptive home by a licensed child placement agency, such agency shall file an affidavit with the court stating that the agency's license is in good standing with the department. A licensed child placement agency involved
in an adoption proceeding pursuant to this article 5 shall immediately notify the court in writing of any suspension, revocation, or denial of its license or of any disciplinary action taken against the agency by the state of Colorado.
Failure of the agency to provide such notification is a class 2 misdemeanor. The department shall, by rule, adopt a mechanism by which a child placement agency shall notify the court of any disciplinary action against the agency.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 807, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 89:
(1) amended, p. 939, § 3, effective March 21.

L. 94:
(5) and (6) amended, p. 2688, § 212, effective July 1.

L. 97:
Entire section amended, p. 1163, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 98:
(2.5) added and (6) amended, p. 1423, §§ 10, 11, effective July 1.

L. 99:
IP(2), (2.5)(a), and (5) to (7) amended, p. 1018, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2001:
(2.5) amended, p. 851, § 13, effective June 1.

L. 2003:
(2.5)(a) amended, p. 1016, § 29, effective July 1; (2.5)(a) amended, p. 1407, § 13, effective January 1, 2004.

L. 2005:
(2.5) amended, p. 584, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 2007:
(2.5)(b) amended and (2.5)(a.5) added, p. 693, § 1, effective May 3; (2.5)(a)(I), (2.5)(a)(IV)(C), and (2.5)(c) amended, p. 1019, § 10, effective May 22.

L. 2018:
(1), IP(2), (2.5)(a)(I), (2.5)(a)(II), IP(2.5)(a)(IV), (2.5)(c), and (8) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 427, § 72, effective August 8.

L. 2021:
(9) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3221, § 390, effective March 1, 2022.

19-5-207.3. Placement of sibling groups.

When a child is placed for adoption by the county department, if the child is part of a sibling group, as defined in section 19-1-103, the county department shall include in the adoption report prepared for the court the names and current physical custody
and location of any siblings of the child who are also available for adoption; except that the names of children, parents, caretakers, and adoptive parents and any means of identifying such persons must not be made available to
any party to the adoption proceeding except upon order of the court or as otherwise permitted by law.

If the child is part of a sibling group, the county department shall make thorough efforts to locate a joint placement for all of the children in the sibling group who are available for adoption. If the county department locates an appropriate, capable,
willing, and available joint placement for all of the children in the sibling group, it shall be presumed that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint placement is in the best interests of the children. Such presumption
may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint placement is not in the best interests of a child or of the children.

If the child is part of a sibling group, as defined in section 19-1-103, and is being placed for adoption by a child placement agency in either a circumstance involving siblings who are the result of a multiple birth or a circumstance in which a parent
has relinquished parental rights to the children to a child placement agency, the child placement agency shall make thorough efforts to locate a joint placement for all of the children in the sibling group who are available for
adoption. If the child placement agency locates an appropriate, capable, willing, and available joint placement for all of the children in the sibling group, it is presumed that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint
placement is in the best interests of the children. Such presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint placement is not in the best interests of a child or
of the children. If an entire sibling group is not placed together in an adoptive placement, the child placement agency shall place as many siblings of the group together as possible, considering their relationship and the best
interests of each child.

Consideration of the placement of children together as a sibling group shall not delay the efforts for expedited permanency planning or permanency planning in order to achieve permanency for each child in the sibling group.

Source:

L. 2000:
Entire section added, p. 477, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2003:
(2) and (3) amended, p. 2628, § 10, effective June 5.

L. 2021:
(1) and (3) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 735, § 89, effective October 1.

19-5-207.5. Legislative declaration - standardized home studies - adoptive family resource registry - rules.

Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that there are a growing number of children in the legal custody of the county departments of human or social services who are the victims of physical or sexual abuse, neglect, or abandonment and who are awaiting permanent placement
in safe, loving, and nurturing adoptive homes. The general assembly further finds that with the expedited permanency procedures that have been established and with the enactment of legislation implementing the federal
"Adoption and Safe Families Act of 1997", Pub.L. 105-89, it is anticipated that the number of children available for adoption will continue to increase dramatically and that there will be a corresponding increased
need to identify statewide those families that are willing and qualified to adopt these needy children.

The general assembly finds that, although the county departments of human or social services have made admirable efforts in assessing and reporting on the qualifications of families interested in adopting, there is a need to make the valuable resource
of such qualified families more available and accessible to all counties in the state in order to satisfy the growing need for suitable adoptive families.

Accordingly, the general assembly determines that it is appropriate and desirable for the state department to aid the county departments of human or social services in their efforts to achieve permanency for children in their legal custody who are available
for adoption by making accessible to such county departments a statewide adoptive family resource registry of families who are qualified for and desirous of adopting children with special needs. Toward that end, the general
assembly further determines that it would be beneficial to such children and families for the state department to develop an approved vendor list of qualified home study providers by region, standardized investigation criteria,
and minimum uniform adoptive home study report standards in order to achieve more timely adoptive placements, to reduce the burden associated with the adoption process, and to avert the possibility of failed adoptions.

Approved vendor lists for home studies.

In order to achieve greater access to qualified families seeking to adopt children, to expedite permanency placement for children available for adoption, and to obtain reliable, high-quality assessments of families that can result in permanent and healthy
placements, the state department shall develop an approved vendor list of county departments, individuals, and child placement agencies qualified to prepare the home study reports in public adoptions as required by section
19-5-207 (2).

On or before January 1, 2000, the state department shall issue a public request for applications from county departments of human or social services, individuals, and child placement agencies desirous of conducting investigations and preparing written
home study reports for prospective public adoptions in specified counties or geographic regions. The state department shall review the applications it receives and shall determine which applicants meet the qualifying
criteria identified by the state board of human services pursuant to subsection (2)(b)(II) of this section. Each county department of human or social services, individual, or child placement agency that meets the
qualifying criteria must be placed on the approved vendor list of home study report providers.

The state board of human services shall promulgate rules identifying the qualifying criteria that county departments of human or social services, individuals, and child placement agencies must meet in order to qualify as an approved vendor pursuant to
this subsection (2)(b) for the purpose of conducting adoptive investigations and preparing home study reports. All county departments of human or social services, qualified individuals, and child placement agencies
that submit applications to the state department and that meet the qualifying criteria must be selected to perform home studies and, once such county departments, individuals, or agencies have been approved by the
state department pursuant to this subsection (2)(b), they shall be available to perform home studies in the specified county or region.

All qualified county departments of human or social services, individuals, and child placement agencies approved by the state department to conduct home studies pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section shall prepare their home study reports in compliance
with the minimum uniform standards prescribed by rule of the state board as described in subsection (3) of this section and any other additional criteria and standards established by a particular county pursuant to subsection
(3)(b) of this section.

Each qualified county department of human or social services, individual, or child placement agency approved by the state department may promote the adoption of available children through a public information campaign directed at educating and informing
the public about the need for safe and healthy adoptive families. Regional educational campaigns are encouraged.

All qualified county departments of human or social services, individuals, and child placement agencies approved by the state department pursuant to this subsection (2) may participate in the statewide training provided by the state department.

Standards for home studies.

The state board of human services shall promulgate rules identifying the criteria for the investigation and the minimum uniform standards for the home study reports with which the qualified county departments of human or social services, individuals,
or child placement agencies approved by the state department must comply. The criteria must include, but are not limited to:

The quality standards that the county department of human or social services, the individual, or the child placement agency must achieve;

The time frames within which the county department of human or social services, the individual, or the child placement agency must complete the investigations and home study reports; and

The capacity of the county department of human or social services, the individual, or the child placement agency to assess the abilities of prospective adoptive families to meet the needs of a child with special needs.

Nothing in this section prohibits a county department of human or social services from establishing additional criteria and standards that a county department of human or social services, an individual, or a child placement agency must meet in preparing
a home study report.

Fees for investigations and home studies.

Any person who, by his or her own request or by order of the court as provided in section 19-5-209, is the subject of a home study report and investigation conducted pursuant to section 19-5-207 by a county department of human or social services, an individual,
or a child placement agency is required to pay, based on an ability to pay, the cost of such report and investigation.

In public adoptions, the state board of human services shall promulgate rules establishing the maximum amount that a county department of human or social services, an individual, or a child placement agency may charge a prospective adoptive family for
the investigation, fingerprint-based criminal history record checks, and home study report required pursuant to section 19-5-207.

The county department of human or social services may waive the fee established pursuant to this subsection (4) if the fee poses a barrier to the adoption of a child for whom a county department of human or social services has financial responsibility.

In addition to the fee specified in subsection (4)(a) of this section, if the county department of human or social services has not placed a child available for a public adoption with a family who is the subject of an investigation and home study report
after six months, then the county shall refer the family and the home study report for such family to the adoptive family resource registry established pursuant to subsection (5) of this section if there is written
consent pursuant to subsection (5)(c)(I) of this section. Prior to referral of a prospective adoptive family to the adoptive family resource registry, the prospective adoptive family must be assessed and shall pay
a nonrefundable administrative fee in an amount to be determined by rule of the state board of human services. A family must not be assessed the fee described in this subsection (4)(b) if the family is not referred
to the adoptive family resource registry.

The department or the contractor selected by the department to administer the adoptive family resource registry shall collect the administrative fee established by rule of the state board of human services pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph
(b) and apply the revenue from said fees to offset the costs incurred for the administration of the adoptive family resource registry.

Nothing in this paragraph (b) shall be construed to prevent a county from referring a family to the adoptive family resource registry before the six month period has lapsed.

Adoptive family resource registry.

Subject to available funds as specified in subsection (5)(b)(III) of this section, the state department shall establish a statewide adoptive family resource registry that county departments of human or social services may access to determine the availability
of qualified families seeking to adopt a child in the custody of a county department of human or social services. The state department is authorized to contract with a public or private entity for the provision of this
service.

The executive director of the department is authorized to accept and expend on behalf of the state any funds, grants, gifts, or donations from any private or public source for the purpose of establishing the statewide adoptive family resource registry;
except that no gift, grant, or donation shall be accepted if the conditions attached thereto require the expenditure thereof in a manner contrary to law.

The executive director of the department is authorized to apply for a federal waiver, if necessary, to authorize the use of federal grant moneys to implement this section.

No general fund moneys shall be expended for the establishment of the adoptive family resource registry. The adoptive family resource registry shall be established only upon the receipt of sufficient grants, gifts, and donations pursuant to subparagraph
(I) of this paragraph (b).

No home study report, or any other information concerning a person interested in a public adoption shall be submitted to the adoptive family resource registry without such person's written consent.

The state board of human services shall promulgate rules specifying the limited amount of nonidentifying data concerning a person interested in a public adoption that is available to county departments of human or social services on the internet through
the adoptive family resource registry.

The state board of human services shall promulgate rules identifying the standards and procedures with which the department or the contractor selected by the department to administer the adoptive family resource registry shall comply in order to preserve
the confidentiality and privacy of the prospective adoptive family as much as possible.

Source:

L. 99:
Entire section added, p. 1019, § 2, effective May 29.

L. 2018:
(1), (2), (3), (4)(a), (4)(b)(I), (5)(a), and (5)(c)(II) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 429, § 73, effective August 8.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

19-5-208. Petition for adoption - open adoption - post-adoption contact agreement.

The petition for adoption shall be filed not later than thirty-five days after the date on which the child is first placed in the home of the adoptive applicants for the purpose of adoption unless the court finds that there was reasonable cause or excusable
neglect for not filing the petition. The court shall then fix a date for the hearing.

Every petition for adoption of a child shall be verified by the petitioner and shall be entitled substantially as follows: "In the matter of the petition of .......... for the adoption of a child." It shall contain:

The name, date and place of birth, race, and place of residence of each petitioner, including the maiden name of the adopting mother, and the date of marriage, if any, of the petitioners;

The name, date and place of birth, and place of residence, if known by the petitioner, of the child to be adopted;

The relationship, if any, of the child to the petitioner;

The full name by which the child shall be known after adoption;

The full description of the property, if any, of the child;

The names of the parents of the child, and the address of each living parent, if known to the petitioner;

The names and addresses of the guardian of the person and the guardian of the estate of the child, if any have been appointed;

The name of the agency or person to whom the custody of the child has been given by proper order of court;

The length of time the child has been in the care and custody of the petitioner;

Names of other children, both natural and adopted and both living and dead, of the adopting parents;

The residence and occupation of each petitioner at or about the time of the birth of the child.

(2.5) (a) Pursuant to the provisions of section 19-1-126, the petition for adoption must:

Include a statement indicating what continuing inquiries the county department of human or social services or child placement agency has made in determining whether the child who is the subject of the proceeding is an Indian child;

Identify whether the child is an Indian child; and

Include the identity of the Indian child's tribe, if the child is identified as an Indian child.

If notices were sent to the parent or Indian custodian of the child and to the Indian child's tribe, pursuant to section 19-1-126, the postal receipts, or copies thereof, shall be attached to the petition for adoption and filed with the court or filed
within ten days after the filing of the petition for adoption, as specified in section 19-1-126 (1)(c).

If the adoption placement is made by the county department of human or social services or a child placement agency, the information required in subsections (2)(b) and (2)(f) of this section must not be included in the petition but transmitted to the court
as part of the home study report required in section 19-5-207.

The petition shall be accompanied by a standardized affidavit form prescribed by the judicial department disclosing any and all fees, costs, or expenses charged or to be charged by any person or agency in connection with the adoption.

(4.5) (a) An agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection (4.5) is considered an open adoption.

Only the petitioner may request a post-adoption contact agreement for contact between a child and the birth parent or parents; a birth relative, as set forth in section 19-3-605 (1); or an Indian tribe if the child is a member of the Indian tribe. A post-adoption
contact agreement may include provisions for contact, visitation, or the exchange of information, and the grounds, if any, on which the adoptive parent may decline to permit visits or cease providing contact or information.
If a child is available for adoption through an expedited relinquishment pursuant to section 19-5-103.5, the contact agreement must be limited to contact between the child and the birth parents and biological siblings of
the child.

If a child is twelve years of age or older, the court shall not order a post-adoption contact agreement unless the child consents to all terms of the contact agreement.

The court shall include the post-adoption contact agreement in the adoption decree if the court finds the contact agreement is in the child's best interests, after considering the child's wishes and any other relevant information.

A parent who has relinquished parental rights pursuant to section 19-5-104, or whose parental rights have been terminated pursuant to section 19-3-604 or 19-5-105, or any birth relative, as set forth in section 19-3-605 (1), must not be a party to the
adoption. Access to the adoption file, with the exception of the post-adoption contact agreement and any pleadings or orders made pursuant to this section to enforce the contact agreement, is governed by part 3 of this
article 5.

A post-adoption contact agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection (4.5) must be submitted to the court on a standardized affidavit form prescribed by the judicial department that contains the following warnings acknowledged by all parties to
the contact agreement:

After the entry of a decree for adoption, an adoption, relinquishment, or termination of parental rights cannot be set aside due to the failure of the adoptive parent, biological parent, a birth relative, or the child to follow the terms of the contact
agreement or any subsequent modifications of the agreement; and

A disagreement between the parties or litigation brought pursuant to section 19-5-217 to enforce or terminate the contact agreement does not affect the validity of the adoption, relinquishment, or termination of parental rights and is not a basis for
orders affecting the custody of the child.

Nothing in this subsection (4.5) permits the court to order ongoing contact or other duties for the petitioner when the petitioner does not request a post-adoption contact agreement as set forth in this subsection (4.5).

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (4.5)(h) is effective until January 9, 2023.] In any case where a post-adoption contact agreement is being considered by the court and a guardian ad litem is currently appointed for the child pursuant to section
19-3-203, the court shall appoint the guardian ad litem to represent the best interests of the child with respect to the contact agreement. The guardian ad litem's representation in these proceedings is limited solely to
making a recommendation as to whether the agreement proposed by the petitioner is in the best interests of the child and should be adopted as proposed. The court shall not make additions or modifications to the agreement
in accordance with the recommendations of the guardian ad litem unless the petitioner consents to the additions or modifications. The duties of the guardian ad litem terminate upon the entry of the decree of adoption.

(h)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (4.5)(h) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
In any case where a post-adoption contact agreement is being considered by the court and a guardian ad litem or counsel for youth is currently appointed for the child or youth pursuant to section 19-3-203,
the court shall appoint the guardian ad litem to represent the best interests of the child or youth, or the counsel for youth to represent the position and objectives that the child or youth want, with respect to the
contact agreement. The guardian ad litem's or counsel for youth's representation in these proceedings is limited solely to making a recommendation as to whether the agreement proposed by the petitioner is in the best
interests of the child and should be adopted as proposed. The court shall not make additions or modifications to the agreement in accordance with the recommendations of the guardian ad litem or counsel for youth unless
the petitioner consents to the additions or modifications. The duties of the guardian ad litem or counsel for youth terminate upon the entry of the decree of adoption.

In all stepparent, second parent, custodial, and kinship adoptions, the petition shall contain a statement informing the court whether the prospective adoptive parent was convicted at any time by a court of competent jurisdiction of a felony or misdemeanor
in one of the following areas: Child abuse or neglect; spousal abuse; any crime against a child; any crime, the underlying factual basis of which has been found by the court on the record to include an act of domestic violence,
as defined in section 18-6-800.3, C.R.S.; violation of a protection order, as described in section 18-6-803.5, C.R.S.; any crime involving violence, rape, sexual assault, or homicide; or any felony physical assault or battery.
In addition, the petitioner shall attach to the petition a current criminal history records check paid for by the petitioner.

In all custodial and kinship adoptions, the petition must contain a statement that the petitioner has consulted with the appropriate local county department of human or social services concerning the possible eligibility of the petitioner and the child
for temporary assistance for needy families (TANF), medicaid, subsidized adoption, and other services or public assistance administered by the county department of human or social services.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 808, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 97:
(4) amended, p. 1165, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 99:
(3) amended, p. 1025, § 8, effective May 29; (5) and (6) added, p. 1063, § 5, effective June 1.

L. 2002:
(2.5) added, p. 788, § 9, effective May 30.

L. 2004:
(5) amended, p. 328, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2007:
(5) amended, p. 838, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2012:
(1) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 880, § 141, effective July 1.

L. 2018:
IP(2.5)(a), (2.5)(a)(I), (3), and (6) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 432, § 74, effective August 8.

L. 2021:
(4.5) added, (HB 21-1101), ch. 481, p. 3427, § 3, effective September 1.

L. 2022:
(4.5)(h) amended, (HB 22-1038), ch. 92, p. 443, § 28, effective January 9, 2023.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in § 19-4-110 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act enacting subsection (2.5), see section 1 of chapter 217, Session Laws of Colorado 2002. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38,
Session Laws of Colorado 2018. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1038, see section 1 of chapter 92, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

19-5-209. Petition - written home study reports.

Except for stepparent adoptions, kinship adoptions, custodial adoptions, and those cases in which placement for adoption has been made by the court, if a petition for the adoption of a child is not accompanied by the written consent and home study report
of the qualified county department of human or social services, individual, or a licensed child placement agency approved by the state department of human services pursuant to section 19-5-207.5 (2), the court shall order the county
department of human or social services, individual, or licensed child placement agency to make an investigation and file a written home study report substantially in the form outlined in section 19-5-207 (2), including a recommendation
as to whether the adoption should be decreed.

In adoptions where a child placement agency or county department has legal guardianship during the interval between initial placement and the final order of adoption, the child placement agency or county department shall supervise the placement with prospective
adoptive parents and the child. The court, after notice to all parties in interest and hearing thereon, may, for good cause, terminate said placement if, at any time prior to the final decree of adoption, it appears to the court
that said adoption is not in the best interest of the child.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 809, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 99:
(1) amended, p. 1023, § 3, effective May 29; (1) amended, p. 1064, § 6, effective June 1.

L. 2018:
(1) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 432, § 75, effective August 8.